Illinois, session 104th, SB3504.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Landlord and Tenant Act is amended by 5adding Section 35 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 705/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Reporting of tenants' rental payment history. 8(a) A landlord of a dwelling unit of residential real property 9must offer any tenant obligated on the lease the option of 10having the tenant's rental payment information reported to at 11least one nationwide consumer reporting agency that meets the 12definition in Section 603(p) of the federal Fair Credit 13Reporting Act or any other consumer reporting agency that 14meets the definition in Section 603(f) of that Act as long as 15the consumer reporting agency resells or otherwise furnishes 16rental payment information to a nationwide consumer reporting 17agency that meets the definition in Section 603(p) of that 18Act. As used in this Section, "rental payment information" 19means information regarding a tenant's complete, timely 20payments of rent.21    (b) Before reporting a tenant's rental history information 22to a consumer reporting agency in accordance with this 23Section, the landlord must first provide written notice of the   SB3504- 2 -LRB104 19597 JRC 33046 b1offer as described in subsection (d) and obtain written 2authorization from the tenant electing to have the rent 3reported.4    (c) The offer of rental payment information reporting must 5be made at the time of the lease agreement and at least once 6annually thereafter and for any renewal of a lease. A landlord 7may provide the offer of rental payment reporting to the 8tenant by first-class United States mail, email, or the same 9medium used by the landlord to provide the tenant with the 10lease agreement.11    (d) The landlord's notice of the option of rent reporting 12must include all of the following:13        (1) a statement that reporting of the tenant's rental 14    payment information is optional;15        (2) identification of each consumer reporting agency 16    to which rental payment information will be reported;17        (3) a statement that many consumer reporting agencies 18    consider any rental payment late if the payment is overdue 19    by 30 days or more;20        (4) a statement describing which rental payments will 21    be reported and whether these payments are considered 22    timely, late, or missed;23        (5) the amount of any fee charged by the landlord for 24    reporting the tenant's rental payment information;25        (6) instructions on how to submit to the landlord the 26    written election of rental payment information reporting;  SB3504- 3 -LRB104 19597 JRC 33046 b1        (7) a statement that the tenant may opt into rental 2    payment information reporting at any time following the 3    initial offer by the landlord;4        (8) a statement that the tenant may elect to stop 5    rental payment information reporting at any time, but that 6    the tenant will not be able to resume reporting for at 7    least 6 months after the election to opt out;8        (9) instructions on how to opt out of rental payment 9    information reporting; and10        (10) a signature block that the tenant must date and 11    sign in order to accept the offer of rental payment 12    information reporting.13    (e) A tenant may submit the completed written election of 14rent reporting at any time after the tenant receives the offer 15from the landlord.16    (f)(1) If a tenant elects to have that tenant's rental 17payment information reported to a consumer reporting agency, 18the landlord may require that the tenant pay a fee not to 19exceed the actual cost to the landlord to provide the service 20plus $5 per month. The payment or nonpayment of this fee by the 21tenant may not be reported to a consumer reporting agency.22    (2) If a tenant fails to pay any fee required by the 23landlord under this Section, all of the following apply:24        (A) the failure to pay the fee is not a cause for 25    termination of the tenancy;26        (B) the landlord may not deduct the unpaid fee from   SB3504- 4 -LRB104 19597 JRC 33046 b1    the tenant's security deposit or rental payment; and2        (C) if the fee remains unpaid for 30 days or more, the 3    landlord may stop reporting the tenant's rental payments, 4    and the tenant may not elect rent reporting again for a 5    period of 6 months from the date on which the fee first 6    became due.7    (g) A tenant who elects to have rent reported may 8subsequently file a written request with the landlord to stop 9that reporting with which the landlord must comply. A tenant 10who elects to stop reporting may not elect rent reporting 11again for a period of at least 6 months from the date of the 12tenant's written request to stop reporting.13    (h) If a tenant makes deductions from rent or otherwise 14withholds rent as authorized by law, the deductions or 15withholding of rent do not constitute a late rental payment. A 16tenant invoking the right to repair and deduct or withhold 17rent must notify the landlord of the deduction or withholding 18before the date rent is due.19    (i) This Section does not apply to a landlord of a 20residential rental building that contains 15 or fewer dwelling 21units, unless the landlord:22        (1) owns more than one residential rental building, 23    regardless of the number of units in each building; and24        (2) is a corporation, limited liability company in 25    which at least one member is a corporation or a real estate 26    investment trust.